District of Columbia statutes.
8-1015

Repealed

Tire recycling fee.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 16, 36 DCR 595
May 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-117, § 8(b), 41 DCR 524
Sept. 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-178, § 3(h), 41 DCR 5205
May 9, 1995, D.C. Law 11-12, § 2(a), 42 DCR 1265
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 63, 43 DCR 530
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 15, 44 DCR 1271
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9098, 58 DCR 6226
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 11-12, the “D.C. Recycling Fee and Illegal Dumping Amendment Act of 1995”, see Mayor’s Order 95-89, June 22, 1995.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Solid Waste Disposal Fee Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-32, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4083).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Recycling Fee and Illegal Dumping Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-269, July 7, 1994, 41 DCR 4669).
For temporary amendments of section, see § 7(b) of the Illegal Dumping Enforcement Emergency Act of 1993 (D.C. Act 10-89, August 4, 1993, 40 DCR 6074) and § 7(b) of the Illegal Dumping Enforcement Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1993 (D.C. Act 10-138, November 1, 1993, 40 DCR 7741).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Recycling Fee and Illegal Dumping Temporary Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-191, October 1, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 6934).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(b) of Illegal Dumping Enforcement Temporary Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-62, November 20, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 8455).
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (f), substituted “for the purposes set forth in subsection (a)(1) of this section. Any monies not expended at the end of a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia” for “to fund recycling activities in the District, no more than 25% of which shall go to fund the recycling educational and promotional activities of the Environmental Planning Commission”.
1981 Ed., § 6-3415.
This section is referenced in § 8-807.01, § 8-905, § 8-1011, § 8-1015.01, § 8-1017.01, § 8-1022, and § 8-1057.